apertium-fra-spa.fra.metadix
    <pardef n="/avoir__vbhaver">
      <e><p><l>a</l>                <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ai</l>               <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aie</l>              <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aient</l>            <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aies</l>             <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ait</l>              <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>as</l>               <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aura</l>             <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aurai</l>            <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>auraient</l>         <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aurais</l>           <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aurais</l>           <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aurait</l>           <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>auras</l>            <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aurez</l>            <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>auriez</l>           <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aurions</l>          <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="cni"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aurons</l>           <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>auront</l>           <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="fti"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>avaient</l>          <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>avais</l>            <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>avais</l>            <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>avait</l>            <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>avez</l>             <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>aviez</l>            <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>avions</l>           <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>avoir</l>            <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>avons</l>            <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayant</l>            <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayant</l>            <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ppres"/><s n="p3"/><s n="ND"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayez</l>             <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ayons</l>            <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eu</l>               <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="RL"><p><l>eu</l>        <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eurent</l>           <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eus</l>              <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eus</l>              <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eusse</l>            <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eussent</l>          <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eusses</l>           <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eussiez</l>          <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eussions</l>         <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eut</l>              <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eûmes</l>            <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eût</l>              <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>eûtes</l>            <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ont</l>              <r>avoir<s n="vbhaver"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="avoir">                          <par n="/avoir__vbhaver"/></e>
